Illinois, session 104th, SB3818.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Military Code of Illinois is amended by 5adding Section 22-9.2 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 1805/22-9.2 new)7    Sec. 22-9.2. Joint Enlistment Enhancement Program (JEEP). 8    (a) The Department of Military Affairs has the authority 9to make grants from the Military Affairs Trust Fund for the 10purpose of incentivizing recruitment into the Illinois 11National Guard. The Joint Enlistment Enhancement Program 12(JEEP) is established for the purpose of increasing 13recruitment through peer-to-peer referrals, fostering esprit 14de corps, and promoting cross-component cooperation between 15the Illinois Army National Guard and the Illinois Air National 16Guard. Under the JEEP program, the Department of Military 17Affairs may provide grants to current members of the Illinois 18National Guard who are not assigned as recruiters, are in good 19standing, and serve as JEEP lead generators by supporting or 20facilitating the enlistment or accession of soldiers or airmen 21into the Illinois National Guard.22    (b) In addition to amounts transferred into the Military 23Affairs Trust Fund by appropriation, the State Treasurer shall   SB3818 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 20724 KTG 34227 b1accept and deposit into the Fund all gifts, grants, transfers, 2appropriations, and other funds from any lawful public or 3private source that are designated for deposit into the Fund.4    (c) The Department of Military Affairs shall establish 5eligibility criteria, grant conditions, and administrative 6requirements for the JEEP program by rule.